Colorado statutes. Title 38. Property - Real and Personal
Part 1. General Provisions
38-33.3-106.8.
Unreasonable restrictions on electric vehicle charging systems - legislative declaration - definitions.

The general assembly finds, determines, and declares that:

The widespread use of plug-in electric vehicles can dramatically improve energy efficiency and air quality for all Coloradans and should be encouraged wherever possible;

Most homes in Colorado, including the vast majority of new homes, are in common interest communities;

The primary purpose of this section is to ensure that common interest communities provide their residents with at least a meaningful opportunity to take advantage of the availability of plug-in electric vehicles rather than create artificial restrictions on the adoption of this promising technology; and

The general assembly encourages common interest communities not only to allow electric vehicle charging stations in accordance with this section, but also to apply for grants from the electric vehicle grant fund, created in section 24-38.5-103, C.R.S., or otherwise fund the installation of charging stations on common property as an amenity for residents and guests.

Notwithstanding any provision in the declaration, bylaws, or rules and regulations of the association to the contrary, and except as provided in subsection (3) or (3.5) of this section, an association shall not:

Prohibit a unit owner from using, or installing at the unit owner’s expense for the unit owner’s own use, a level 1 or level 2 electric vehicle charging system on or in a unit; or

Assess or charge a unit owner any fee for the placement or use of an electric vehicle charging system on or in the unit owner’s unit; except that the association may require reimbursement for the actual cost of electricity provided by the association that was used by the charging system or, alternatively, may charge a reasonable fee for access. If the charging system is part of a network for which a network fee is charged, the association’s reimbursement may include the amount of the network fee. Nothing in this section requires an association to impose upon a unit owner any fee or charge other than the regular assessments specified in the declaration, bylaws, or rules and regulations of the association.

Subsection (2) of this section does not apply to:

Bona fide safety requirements, consistent with an applicable building code or recognized safety standard, for the protection of persons and property;

A requirement that the charging system be registered with the association within thirty days after installation; or

Reasonable aesthetic provisions that govern the dimensions, placement, or external appearance of an electric vehicle charging system.

(3.5)

This section does not apply to a unit, or the owner thereof, if the unit is a time share unit, as defined in section 38-33-110 (7).

An association shall consent to a unit owner’s placement of an electric vehicle charging system on a limited common element parking space, carport, or garage owned by the unit owner or otherwise assigned to the owner in the declaration or other recorded document if:

Notwithstanding any existing ban on electric vehicle charging systems, the system otherwise complies with the declaration, bylaws, and rules and regulations of the association; and

The unit owner agrees in writing to:

Comply with the association’s design specifications for the installation of the system;

Engage the services of a duly licensed and registered electrical contractor familiar with the installation and code requirements of an electric vehicle charging system;

Bear the expense of installation, including costs to restore any common elements disturbed in the process of installing the system; and

Provide, within the time specified in sub-subparagraph (B) of this subparagraph (IV), a certificate of insurance naming the association as an additional insured on the homeowner’s insurance policy for any claim related to the installation, maintenance, or use of the system or, if the system is located on a common element, reimbursement to the association for the actual cost of any increased insurance premium amount attributable to the system, notwithstanding any provision to the contrary in the association’s declaration, bylaws, or rules and regulations.

A certificate of insurance under sub-subparagraph (A) of this subparagraph (IV) must be provided within fourteen days after the unit owner receives the association’s consent for the installation. Reimbursement for an increased insurance premium amount under sub-subparagraph (A) of this subparagraph (IV) must be provided within fourteen days after the unit owner receives the association’s invoice for the amount attributable to the system.

If the association consents to a unit owner’s installation of an electric vehicle charging system on a limited common element, including a parking space, carport, or garage stall, then, unless otherwise specified in a written contract or in the declaration, bylaws, or rules and regulations of the association:

The unit owner, and each successive unit owner with exclusive rights to the limited common element where the charging system is installed, is responsible for any costs for damages to the system, any other limited common element or general common element of the common interest community, and any adjacent units, garage stalls, carports, or parking spaces that arise or result from the installation, maintenance, repair, removal, or replacement of the system;

Each successive unit owner with exclusive rights to the limited common element shall assume responsibility for the repair, maintenance, removal, and replacement of the charging system until the system has been removed;

The unit owner and each successive unit owner with exclusive rights to the limited common element shall at all times have and maintain an insurance policy covering the obligations of the unit owner under this subsection (5), is subject to all obligations specified under subparagraph (IV) of paragraph (b) of subsection (4) of this section, and shall name the association as an additional insured under the policy; and

The unit owner and each successive unit owner with exclusive rights to the limited common element is responsible for removing the system if reasonably necessary or convenient for the repair, maintenance, or replacement of the limited common elements or general common elements of the common interest community.

A charging system installed at the unit owner’s cost is property of the unit owner. Upon sale of the unit, if the charging system is removable, the unit owner may either remove it or sell it to the buyer of the unit or to the association for an agreed price. Nothing in this subsection (6) requires the buyer or the association to purchase the charging system.

As used in this section:

“Electric vehicle charging system” or “charging system” means a device that is used to provide electricity to a plug-in electric vehicle or plug-in hybrid vehicle, is designed to ensure that a safe connection has been made between the electric grid and the vehicle, and is able to communicate with the vehicle’s control system so that electricity flows at an appropriate voltage and current level. An electric vehicle charging system may be wall-mounted or pedestal style and may provide multiple cords to connect with electric vehicles. An electric vehicle charging system must be certified by underwriters laboratories or an equivalent certification and must comply with the current version of article 625 of the national electrical code.

“Level 1” means a charging system that provides charging through a one-hundred-twenty volt AC plug with a cord connector that meets the SAE international J1772 standard or a successor standard.

“Level 2” means a charging system that provides charging through a two-hundred-eight to two-hundred-forty volt AC plug with a cord connector that meets the SAE international J1772 standard or a successor standard.

This section applies only to residential units.

History.

Source:
L. 2013:

Entire section added, (SB 13-126), ch. 165, p. 535, § 2, effective May 3.

38-33.3-107.
Eminent domain.

If a unit is acquired by eminent domain or part of a unit is acquired by eminent domain leaving the unit owner with a remnant which may not practically or lawfully be used for any purpose permitted by the declaration, the award must include compensation to the unit owner for that unit and its allocated interests whether or not any common elements are acquired. Upon acquisition, unless the decree otherwise provides, that unit’s allocated interests are automatically reallocated to the remaining units in proportion to the respective allocated interests of those units before the taking. Any remnant of a unit remaining after part of a unit is taken under this subsection (1) is thereafter a common element.

Except as provided in subsection (1) of this section, if part of a unit is acquired by eminent domain, the award must compensate the unit owner for the reduction in value of the unit and its interest in the common elements whether or not any common elements are acquired. Upon acquisition, unless the decree otherwise provides:

That unit’s allocated interests are reduced in proportion to the reduction in the size of the unit or on any other basis specified in the declaration; and

The portion of allocated interests divested from the partially acquired unit is automatically reallocated to that unit and to the remaining units in proportion to the respective interests of those units before the taking, with the partially acquired unit participating in the reallocation on the basis of its reduced allocated interests.

If part of the common elements is acquired by eminent domain, that portion of any award attributable to the common elements taken must be paid to the association. Unless the declaration provides otherwise, any portion of the award attributable to the acquisition of a limited common element must be equally divided among the owners of the units to which that limited common element was allocated at the time of acquisition. For the purposes of acquisition of a part of the common elements other than the limited common elements under this subsection (3), service of process on the association shall constitute sufficient notice to all unit owners, and service of process on each individual unit owner shall not be necessary.

The court decree shall be recorded in every county in which any portion of the common interest community is located.

The reallocations of allocated interests pursuant to this section shall be confirmed by an amendment to the declaration prepared, executed, and recorded by the association.

History.

Source:
L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 1708, § 1, effective July 1, 1992.

38-33.3-108.
Supplemental general principles of law applicable.

The principles of law and equity, including, but not limited to, the law of corporations and unincorporated associations, the law of real property, and the law relative to capacity to contract, principal and agent, eminent domain, estoppel, fraud, misrepresentation, duress, coercion, mistake, receivership, substantial performance, or other validating or invalidating cause supplement the provisions of this article, except to the extent inconsistent with this article.

History.

Source:
L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 1709, § 1, effective July 1, 1992.

38-33.3-109.
Construction against implicit repeal.

This article is intended to be a unified coverage of its subject matter, and no part of this article shall be construed to be impliedly repealed by subsequent legislation if that construction can reasonably be avoided.

History.

Source:
L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 1709, § 1, effective July 1, 1992.

38-33.3-110.
Uniformity of application and construction.

This article shall be applied and construed so as to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of this article among states enacting it.

History.

Source:
L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 1709, § 1, effective July 1, 1992.

38-33.3-111.
Severability.

If any provision of this article or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this article which can be given effect without the invalid provisions or application, and, to this end, the provisions of this article are severable.

History.

Source:
L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 1709, § 1, effective July 1, 1992.

38-33.3-112.
Unconscionable agreement or term of contract.

The court, upon finding as a matter of law that a contract or contract clause relating to a common interest community was unconscionable at the time the contract was made, may refuse to enforce the contract, enforce the remainder of the contract without the unconscionable clause, or limit the application of any unconscionable clause in order to avoid an unconscionable result.

Whenever it is claimed, or appears to the court, that a contract or any contract clause relating to a common interest community is or may be unconscionable, the parties, in order to aid the court in making the determination, shall be afforded a reasonable opportunity to present evidence as to:

The commercial setting of the negotiations;

Whether the first party has knowingly taken advantage of the inability of the second party reasonably to protect such second party’s interests by reason of physical or mental infirmity, illiteracy, or inability to understand the language of the agreement or similar factors;

The effect and purpose of the contract or clause; and

If a sale, any gross disparity at the time of contracting between the amount charged for the property and the value of that property measured by the price at which similar property was readily obtainable in similar transactions. A disparity between the contract price and the value of the property measured by the price at which similar property was readily obtainable in similar transactions does not, of itself, render the contract unconscionable.

History.

Source:
L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 1709, § 1, effective July 1, 1992.

L. 93:

(2)(b) amended, p. 643, § 3, effective April 30.

38-33.3-113.
Obligation of good faith.

Every contract or duty governed by this article imposes an obligation of good faith in its performance or enforcement.

History.

Source:
L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 1710, § 1, effective July 1, 1992.

38-33.3-114.
Remedies to be liberally administered.

The remedies provided by this article shall be liberally administered to the end that the aggrieved party is put in as good a position as if the other party had fully performed. However, consequential, special, or punitive damages may not be awarded except as specifically provided in this article or by other rule of law.

Any right or obligation declared by this article is enforceable by judicial proceeding.

History.

Source:
L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 1710, § 1, effective July 1, 1992.

38-33.3-115.
Applicability to new common interest communities.

Except as provided in section 38-33.3-116, this article applies to all common interest communities created within this state on or after July 1, 1992. The provisions of sections 38-33-101 to 38-33-109 do not apply to common interest communities created on or after July 1, 1992. The provisions of sections 38-33-110 to 38-33-113 shall remain in effect for all common interest communities.

History.

Source:
L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 1710, § 1, effective July 1, 1992.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 644, § 4, effective April 30.

38-33.3-116.
Exception for new small cooperatives and small and limited expense planned communities.

If a cooperative created in this state on or after July 1, 1992, but prior to July 1, 1998, contains only units restricted to nonresidential use or contains no more than ten units and is not subject to any development rights, it is subject only to sections 38-33.3-105 to 38-33.3-107, unless the declaration provides that this entire article is applicable. If a planned community created in this state on or after July 1, 1992, but prior to July 1, 1998, contains no more than ten units and is not subject to any development rights or if a planned community provides, in its declaration, that the annual average common expense liability of each unit restricted to residential purposes, exclusive of optional user fees and any insurance premiums paid by the association, may not exceed four hundred dollars, as adjusted pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, it is subject only to sections 38-33.3-105 to 38-33.3-107, unless the declaration provides that this entire article is applicable.

If a cooperative or planned community created in this state on or after July 1, 1998, contains only units restricted to nonresidential use, or contains no more than twenty units and is not subject to any development rights, it is subject only to sections 38-33.3-105 to 38-33.3-107, unless the declaration provides that this entire article is applicable. If a planned community created in this state after July 1, 1998, provides, in its declaration, that the annual average common expense liability of each unit restricted to residential purposes, exclusive of optional user fees and any insurance premiums paid by the association, may not exceed four hundred dollars, as adjusted pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, it is subject only to sections 38-33.3-105 to 38-33.3-107, unless the declaration provides that this entire article is applicable.

The dollar limitation set forth in subsections (1) and (2) of this section shall be increased annually on July 1, 1999, and on July 1 of each succeeding year in accordance with any increase in the United States department of labor bureau of labor statistics final consumer price index for the Denver-Boulder consolidated metropolitan statistical area for the preceding calendar year. The limitation shall not be increased if the final consumer price index for the preceding calendar year did not increase and shall not be decreased if the final consumer price index for the preceding calendar year decreased.

History.

Source:
L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 1710, § 1, effective July 1, 1992.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 644, § 5, effective April 30.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 477, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(1) and (2) amended,(SB 09-249), ch. 248, p. 1119, § 1, effective May 14.

L. 2016:

(1) and (3) amended,(HB 16-1149), ch. 104, p. 300, § 2, effective July 1, 2018.

Editor’s note:

Section 4(2) of chapter 104 (HB 16-1149), Session Laws of Colorado 2016, provides that changes to this section by the act apply to budgets adopted by a common interest community’s executive board on or after July 1, 2018.

38-33.3-116.3.
Large planned communities - exemption from certain requirements.

A planned community shall be exempt from the provisions of this article as specified in subsection (3) of this section or as specifically exempted in any other provision of this article, if, at the time of recording the affidavit required pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, the real estate upon which the planned community is created meets both of the following requirements:

It consists of at least two hundred acres;

It is approved for development of at least five hundred residential units, excluding any interval estates, time-share estates, or time-span estates but including any interval units created pursuant to sections

38-33-110

and

38-33-111

, and at least twenty thousand square feet of commercial use.

(Deleted by amendment,

L

. 95, p. 236, § 2, effective July 1, 1995.)

For an exemption authorized in subsection (1) of this section to apply, the property must be zoned within each county in which any part of such parcel is located, and the owner of the parcel shall record with the county clerk and recorder of each county in which any part of such parcel is located an affidavit setting forth the following:

The legal description of such parcel of land;

A statement that the party signing the affidavit is the owner of the parcel in its entirety in fee simple, excluding mineral interests;

The acreage of the parcel;

The zoning classification of the parcel, with a certified copy of applicable zoning regulations attached; and

A statement that neither the owner nor any officer, director, shareholder, partner, or other entity having more than a ten-percent equity interest in the owner has been convicted of a felony within the last ten years.

A large planned community for which an affidavit has been filed pursuant to subsection (2) of this section shall be exempt from the following provisions of this article:

Section 38-33.3-205 (1)(e) to (1)(m);

Section 38-33.3-207 (3);

Section 38-33.3-208;

Section 38-33.3-209 (2)(b) to (2)(d), (2)(f), (2)(g), (4), and (6);

Section 38-33.3-210;

Section 38-33.3-212;

Section 38-33.3-213;

Section 38-33.3-215;

Section 38-33.3-217 (1);

Section 38-33.3-304.

Section 38-33.3-217 (4) shall be applicable as follows: Except to the extent expressly permitted or required by other provisions of this article, no amendment may create or increase special declarant rights, increase the number of units or the allocated interests of a unit, or the uses to which any unit is restricted, in the absence of unanimous consent of the unit owners.

The exemption authorized by this section shall continue for the large planned community so long as the owner signing the affidavit is the owner of the real estate described in subsection (2) of this section; except that:

Upon the sale, conveyance, or other transfer of any portion of the real estate within the large planned community, the portion sold, conveyed, or transferred shall become subject to all the provisions of this article;

Any common interest community created on some but not all of the real estate within the large planned community shall be created pursuant to this article; and

When a planned community no longer qualifies as a large planned community, as described in subsection (1) of this section, the exemptions authorized by this section shall no longer be applicable.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subparagraph (III) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (5), all real estate described in a recorded declaration creating a large planned community shall remain subject to such recorded declaration.

The association established for a large planned community shall operate with respect to large planned community-wide matters and shall not otherwise operate as the exclusive unit owners’ association with respect to any unit.

The association established for a large planned community shall keep in its principal office and make reasonably available to all unit owners, unit owners’ authorized agents, and prospective purchasers of units a complete legal description of all common elements within the large planned community.

History.

Source:
L. 94:

Entire section added, p. 2845, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 95:

IP(1), (1)(b), (1)(c), and (5) amended and (7) added, p. 236, § 2, effective July 1.

38-33.3-117.
Applicability to preexisting common interest communities.

Except as provided in section

38-33.3-119

, the following sections apply to all common interest communities created within this state before July 1, 1992, with respect to events and circumstances occurring on or after July 1, 1992:

38-33.3-101

and

38-33.3-102

;

38-33.3-103

, to the extent necessary in construing any of the other sections of this article;

38-33.3-104

to

38-33.3-111

;

38-33.3-114

;

38-33.3-118

;

38-33.3-120

;

38-33.3-122

and

38-33.3-123

;

38-33.3-203

and

38-33.3-217 (7)

;

38-33.3-302 (1)(a)

to (1)(f), (1)(j) to (1)(m), and (1)(o) to (1)(q);

38-33.3-221.5

;

38-33.3-303 (1)(b)

and (3)(b);

38-33.3-311

;

38-33.3-316

;

38-33.3-316.3

; and

38-33.3-317

, as it existed prior to January 1, 2006,

38-33.3-318

, and

38-33.3-319

.

(1.5)

Except as provided in section

38-33.3-119

, the following sections apply to all common interest communities created within this state before July 1, 1992, with respect to events and circumstances occurring on or after January 1, 2006:

(Deleted by amendment,

L

. 2006, p. 1217, § 3, effective May 26, 2006.)

38-33.3-124

;

38-33.3-209.4

to

38-33.3-209.7

;

38-33.3-217 (1)

;

(Deleted by amendment,

L

. 2006, p. 1217, § 3, effective May 26, 2006.)

38-33.3-301

;

38-33.3-302 (3)

and (4);

38-33.3-303 (1)(b)

, (3)(b), and (4)(b);

38-33.3-308 (1)

, (2)(b), (2.5), and (4.5);

38-33.3-310 (1)

and (2);

38-33.3-310.5

;

38-33.3-315 (7)

;

38-33.3-317

; and

38-33.3-401

.

(1.7)

Except as provided in section 38-33.3-119, section

38-33.3-209.5 (1)(b)

(IX) shall apply to all common interest communities created within this state before July 1, 1992, with respect to events and circumstances occurring on or after July 1, 2010.

(1.8)

Except as provided in section 38-33.3-119, section

38-33.3-303 (4)(a)

applies to all common interest communities created within this state before July 1, 1992, with respect to events and circumstances occurring on or after July 1, 2017.

(1.9)

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, section

38-33.3-303.5

applies to all common interest communities created within this state on, before, or after July 1, 1992, with respect to events and circumstances occurring on or after September 1, 2017.

The sections specified in paragraphs

to (j) and (l) of subsection (1) of this section, and express requirements or restrictions in a declaration, bylaws, a plat, or a map in existence on June 30, 1992, such requirements or restrictions in the declaration, bylaws, plat, or map shall control, but only to the extent necessary to avoid invalidation of the specific requirement or restriction in the declaration, bylaws, plat, or map. Sections 38-33.3-217 (7) and 38-33.3-316 shall be applied and construed as stated in such sections.

Except as expressly provided for in this section, this article shall not apply to common interest communities created within this state before July 1, 1992.

Section 38-33.3-308 (2) to (7) shall apply to all common interest communities created within this state before July 1, 1995, and shall apply to all meetings of the executive board of such a community or any committee thereof occurring on or after said date. In addition, said section 38-33.3-308 (2) to (7) shall apply to all common interest communities created on or after July 1, 1995, and shall apply to all meetings of the executive board of such a community or any committee thereof occurring on or after said date.

History.

Source:
L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 1711, § 1, effective July 1, 1992; entire section amended, p. 1928, § 64, effective July 1, 1992.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 644, § 6, effective April 30.

L. 95:

(4) added, p. 889, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 99:

(1)(h) amended, p. 695, § 2, effective May 19.

L. 2002:

(2) amended, p. 767, § 1, effective August 7.

L. 2005:

(1)(g) and (1)(l) amended and (1)(i.5) and (1.5) added, p. 1375, §§ 3, 4, effective January 1, 2006.

L. 2006:

(1)(g), (1.5)(a), and (1.5)(e) amended, p. 1217, § 3, effective May 26.

L. 2009:

(1)(i.7) and (1.7) added and (1.5)(h) amended,(HB 09-1359), ch. 257, p. 1165, §§ 3, 4, effective August 5.

L. 2013:

IP(1.5), (1.5)(l), and (1.5)(m) amended and (1.5)(n) added,(HB 13-1134), ch. 198, p. 808, § 4, effective August 7; IP(1) amended and (1)(k.5) added,(HB 13-1276), ch. 351, p. 2038, § 4, effective January 1, 2014.

L. 2016:

(1.8) added,(HB 16-1149), ch. 104, p. 300, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

L. 2017:

(1.9) added,(HB 17-1279), ch. 232, p. 906, § 2, effective May 23.

L. 2018:

(1.8) amended,(HB 18-1342), ch. 387, p. 2317, § 1, effective July 1.

38-33.3-118.
Procedure to elect treatment under the “Colorado Common Interest Ownership Act”.

Any organization created prior to July 1, 1992, may elect to have the common interest community be treated as if it were created after June 30, 1992, and thereby subject the common interest community to all of the provisions contained in this article, in the following manner:

If there are members or stockholders entitled to vote thereon, the board of directors may adopt a resolution recommending that such association accept this article and directing that the question of acceptance be submitted to a vote at a meeting of the members or stockholders entitled to vote thereon, which may be either an annual or special meeting. The question shall also be submitted whenever one-twentieth, or, in the case of an association with over one thousand members, one-fortieth, of the members or stockholders entitled to vote thereon so request. Written notice stating that the purpose, or one of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider electing to be treated as a common interest community organized after June 30, 1992, and thereby accepting the provisions of this article, together with a copy of this article, shall be given to each person entitled to vote at the meeting within the time and in the manner provided in the articles of incorporation, declaration, bylaws, or other governing documents for such association for the giving of notice of meetings to members. Such election to accept the provisions of this article shall require for adoption at least sixty-seven percent of the votes that the persons present at such meeting in person or by proxy are entitled to cast.

If there are no persons entitled to vote thereon, the election to be treated as a common interest community under this article may be made at a meeting of the board of directors pursuant to a majority vote of the directors in office.

A statement of election to accept the provisions of this article shall be executed and acknowledged by the president or vice-president and by the secretary or an assistant secretary of such association and shall set forth:

The name of the common interest community and association;

That the association has elected to accept the provisions of this article;

That there were persons entitled to vote thereon, the date of the meeting of such persons at which the election was made to be treated as a common interest community under this article, that a quorum was present at the meeting, and that such acceptance was authorized by at least sixty-seven percent of the votes that the members or stockholders present at such meeting in person or by proxy were entitled to cast;

That there were no members or stockholders entitled to vote thereon, the date of the meeting of the board of directors at which election to accept this article was made, that a quorum was present at the meeting, and that such acceptance was authorized by a majority vote of the directors present at such meeting;

(Deleted by amendment,

L

. 93, p. 645, § 7, effective April 30, 1993.)

The names and respective addresses of its officers and directors; and

If there were no persons entitled to vote thereon but a common interest community has been created by virtue of compliance with section

38-33.3-103 (8)

, that the declarant desires for the common interest community to be subject to all the terms and provisions of this article.

The original statement of election to be treated as a common interest community subject to the terms and conditions of this article shall be duly recorded in the office of the clerk and recorder for the county in which the common interest community is located.

Upon the recording of the original statement of election to be treated as a common interest community subject to the provisions of this article, said common interest community shall be subject to all provisions of this article. Upon recording of the statement of election, such common interest community shall have the same powers and privileges and be subject to the same duties, restrictions, penalties, and liabilities as though it had been created after June 30, 1992.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, and with respect to a common interest community making the election permitted by this section, this article shall apply only with respect to events and circumstances occurring on or after July 1, 1992, and does not invalidate provisions of any declaration, bylaws, or plats or maps in existence on June 30, 1992.

History.

Source:
L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 1711, § 1, effective July 1, 1992; (5) amended, p. 1928, § 65, effective July 1, 1992.

L. 93:

IP(1), (1)(a), (2)(c), and (2)(e) amended, p. 645, § 7, effective April 30.

38-33.3-119.
Exception for small preexisting cooperatives and planned communities.

If a cooperative or planned community created within this state before July 1, 1992, contains no more than ten units and is not subject to any development rights, or if its declaration limits its annual common expense liability to the amount specified in section 38-33.3-116 (1), then it is subject only to sections 38-33.3-105 to 38-33.3-107 unless the declaration is amended in conformity with applicable law and with the procedures and requirements of the declaration to take advantage of the provisions of section 38-33.3-120, in which case all the sections enumerated in section 38-33.3-117 apply to that planned community.

History.

Source:
L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 1713, § 1, effective July 1, 1992.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (SB 09-249), ch. 248, p. 1120, § 2, effective May 14.

L. 2015:

Entire section amended, (HB 15-1095), ch. 114, p. 344, § 1, effective August 5.

38-33.3-120.
Amendments to preexisting governing instruments.

In the case of amendments to the declaration, bylaws, or plats and maps of any common interest community created within this state before July 1, 1992, which has not elected treatment under this article pursuant to section 38-33.3-118:

If the substantive result accomplished by the amendment was permitted by law in effect prior to July 1, 1992, the amendment may be made either in accordance with that law, in which case that law applies to that amendment, or it may be made under this article; and

If the substantive result accomplished by the amendment is permitted by this article, and was not permitted by law in effect prior to July 1, 1992, the amendment may be made under this article.

An amendment to the declaration, bylaws, or plats and maps authorized by this section to be made under this article must be adopted in conformity with the procedures and requirements of the law that applied to the common interest community at the time it was created and with the procedures and requirements specified by those instruments. If an amendment grants to any person any rights, powers, or privileges permitted by this article, all correlative obligations, liabilities, and restrictions in this article also apply to that person.

An amendment to the declaration may also be made pursuant to the procedures set forth in section 38-33.3-217 (7).

History.

Source:
L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 1713, § 1, effective July 1, 1992.

L. 2002:

(3) added, p. 767, § 2, effective August 7.

38-33.3-120.5.
Extension of declaration term.

If a common interest community has a declaration in effect with a limited term of years that was recorded prior to July 1, 1992, and if, before the term of the declaration expires, the unit owners in the common interest community have not amended the declaration pursuant to section 38-33.3-120 and in accordance with any conditions or fixed limitations described in the declaration, the declaration may be extended as provided in this section.

The term of the declaration may be extended:

If the executive board adopts a resolution recommending that the declaration be extended for a specific term not to exceed twenty years and directs that the question of extending the term of the declaration be submitted to the unit owners, as members of the association; and

If an extension of the term of the declaration is approved by vote or agreement of unit owners of units to which at least sixty-seven percent of the votes in the association are allocated or any larger percentage the declaration specifies.

Except for the extension of the term of a declaration as authorized by this section, no other provision of a declaration may be amended pursuant to the provisions of this section.

For any meeting of unit owners at which a vote is to be taken on a proposed extension of the term of a declaration as provided in this section, the secretary or other officer specified in the bylaws shall provide written notice to each unit owner entitled to vote at the meeting stating that the purpose, or one of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider extending the term of the declaration. The notice shall be given in the time and manner specified in section 38-33.3-308 or in the articles of incorporation, declaration, bylaws, or other governing documents of the association.

The extension of the declaration, if approved, shall be included in an amendment to the declaration and shall be executed, acknowledged, and recorded by the association in the records of the clerk and recorder of each county in which any portion of the common interest community is located. The amendment shall include:

A statement of the name of the common interest community and the association;

A statement that the association has elected to extend the term of the declaration pursuant to this section and the term of the approved extension;

A statement that indicates that the executive board has adopted a resolution recommending that the declaration be extended for a specific term not to exceed twenty years, that sets forth the date of the meeting at which the unit owners elected to extend the term of the declaration, and that declares that the extension was authorized by a vote or agreement of unit owners of units to which at least sixty-seven percent of the votes in the association are allocated or any larger percentage the declaration specifies;

A statement of the names and respective addresses of the officers and executive board members of the association.

Upon the recording of the amendment required by subsection (5) of this section, and subject to the provisions of this section, a common interest community is subject to all provisions of the declaration, as amended.

History.

Source:
L. 98:

Entire section added, p. 478, § 3, effective July 1.

38-33.3-121.
Applicability to nonresidential planned communities.

This article does not apply to a planned community in which all units are restricted exclusively to nonresidential use unless the declaration provides that the article does apply to that planned community. This article applies to a planned community containing both units that are restricted exclusively to nonresidential use and other units that are not so restricted, only if the declaration so provides or the real estate comprising the units that may be used for residential purposes would be a planned community in the absence of the units that may not be used for residential purposes.

History.

Source:
L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 1714, § 1, effective July 1, 1992.

38-33.3-122.
Applicability to out-of-state common interest communities.

This article does not apply to common interest communities or units located outside this state.

History.

Source:
L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 1714, § 1, effective July 1, 1992.